District of Columbia statutes.
2-1134

Compliance with local law.

The Regional Authority shall make every effort to comply with the local laws of each of the Signatories regarding disclosure, appointment, and open meetings.

History

Feb. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-63, § 5, 48 DCR 10549